sl-SI: Ime/vrsta posebnega slada: Kisli slad; Jantarni slad; Aromatični slad; Biskvitni slad; Rjavi slad; Carafa (oluščen); Kristalni/karamelni slad; Dekstrin/Carapils; Medeni slad; Melanoidinski slad; Münchenski slad; Ovsni slad; Šotani slad; Rženi slad; Prekajeni slad; Special B; Victory; Dunajski slad; Pšenični slad; Drugo
de: Name/Art des Spezialmalzes: Sauermalz; Ambermalz; Aromamalz; Biscuitmalz; Braunmalz; Carafa (entspelzt); Crystal/Karamell; Dextrin/Carapils; Honigmalz; Melanoidin; Münchner Malz; Hafermalz; Torfrauchmalz; Roggenmalz; Rauchmalz; Special B; Victory; Wiener Malz; Weizenmalz; Sonstige
en: Specialty malt name/type: Acidulated malt; Amber malt; Aromatic; Biscuit; Brown malt; Carafa (dehusked); Crystal/Caramel; Dextrin/Carapils; Honey malt; Melanoidin; Munich; Oat malt; Peated malt; Rye malt; Smoked malt; Special B; Victory; Vienna; Wheat malt; Other
fi: Erikoismallaslajikkeen nimi/tyyppi: Hapanmallas; Amber-mallas; Aromaattinen; Keksi; Brown-mallas; Carafa (kuorittu); Crystal/karamelli; Dextrin/Carapils; Hunajamallas; Melanoidin-mallas; München; Kauramallas; Savumallas (turve); Ruismallas; Savumallas; Special B; Victory-mallas; Wieniläismallas; Vehnämallas; Muu
fr: Nom ou type du malt de spécialité: Malt acidulé; Malt ambré; Aromatique; Biscuit; Malt brun; Carafa (décortiqué); Cristal/caramel; Dextrine/carapils; Malt miel; Mélanoïdine; Munich; Malt d’avoine; Malt tourbé; Malt de seigle; Malt fumé; Spécial B; Victory; Vienne; Malt de blé; Autre
hu: Különleges maláta neve/típusa: Savanyított maláta; Borostyán maláta; Aromamaláta; Keksz; Barna maláta; Carafa (hántolt); Kristály/karamell; Dextrin/Carapils; Méz maláta; Melanoidin; Müncheni; Zabmaláta; Tőzegelt maláta; Rozsmaláta; Füstölt maláta; Special B; Victory; Bécsi; Búzamaláta; Egyéb
ro-RO: Nume/tip de malț de specialitate: Malț acidulat; Malț amber; Aromatic; Biscuit; Malț brun; Carafa (decorticat); Crystal/Caramel; Dextrină/Carapils; Malț de miere; Melanoidină; München; Malț de ovăz; Malț afumat cu turbă; Malț de secară; Malț afumat; Special B; Victory; Viena; Malț de grâu; Altele
nl: Specialty malt naam/type: Zuurmout; Ambermout; Aromatisch; Biscuit; Bruine mout; Carafa (ontpeld); Crystal/caramel; Dextrine/carapils; Honingmout; Melanoïdine; Münchner; Gemoute haver; Geturfde mout; Roggemout; Gerookte mout; Special B; Victory; Wienermout; Tarwemout; Overige
es: Nombre/tipo de malta especial: Malta acidulada; Malta ámbar; Aromática; Biscuit; Malta marrón; Carafa (sin cáscara); Cristal/Caramelo; Dextrina/Carapils; Malta de miel; Melanoidina; Múnich; Malta de avena; Malta turbada; Malta de centeno; Malta ahumada; Special B; Victory; Viena; Malta de trigo; Otro
it: Nome/tipo di malto speciale: Malto acidulato; Malto ambrato; Aromatico; Biscotto; Malto marrone; Carafa (decorticato); Crystal/Caramello; Destrina/Carapils; Malto miele; Melanoidina; Monaco; Malto d'avena; Malto torbato; Malto di segale; Malto affumicato; Special B; Victory; Vienna; Malto di frumento; Altro
cs: Název/druh speciálního sladu: Kyselý slad; Jantarový slad; Aromatický; Sušenkový; Hnědý slad; Carafa (odpluchovaný); Krystalový/karamelový; Dextrin/Carapils; Medový slad; Melanoidinový; Mnichovský; Ovesný slad; Rašelinový slad; Žitný slad; Nakuřovaný slad; Special B; Victory; Vídeňský; Pšeničný slad; Jiné
nb: Spesialmaltnavn/-type: Syremalt; Amber-malt; Aromatisk; Kjeks; Brun malt; Carafa (avskallet); Krystall/karamell; Dekstrin/Carapils; Honningmalt; Melanoidin; Munich; Havremalt; Torvrøykt malt; Rugmalt; Røykmalt; Special B; Victory; Vienna; Hvetemalt; Annet
lt-LT: Specialaus salyklo pavadinimas / tipas: Rūgštusis salyklas; Gintarinis salyklas; Aromatinis; Biskvitinis; Rudasis salyklas; „Carafa“ (be lukštų); Kristalinis / karamelinis; Dekstrininis / „Carapils“; Medaus salyklas; Melanoidininis; Miuncheno; Avižų salyklas; Durpių dūmais rūkytas salyklas; Rugių salyklas; Rūkytas salyklas; „Special B“; „Victory“; Vienos; Kviečių salyklas; Kita
ja: 特殊麦芽の名称/種類: アシッドモルト; アンバーモルト; アロマティック; ビスケット; ブラウンモルト; カラファ (脱殻); クリスタル/カラメル; デキストリン/カラピルス; ハニーモルト; メラノイジン; ミュンヘン; オーツモルト; ピーテッドモルト; ライモルト; スモークモルト; スペシャル B; ビクトリー; ウィーン; ウィートモルト; その他
hr-HR: Naziv/vrsta specijalnog slada: Zakiseljeni slad; Jantarni slad; Aromatični; Biskvitni; Smeđi slad; Carafa (bez ljuske); Kristal / karamel; Dekstrin / Carapils; Medeni slad; Melanoidinski; Münchenski; Zobeni slad; Tresetni slad; Raženi slad; Dimljeni slad; Special B; Victory; Bečki; Pšenični slad; Ostalo
da: Specialmaltnavn eller -type: Syrnet malt; Amber-malt; Aromatisk; Biscuit; Brun malt; Carafa (afskallet); Krystal/karamel; Dextrin/carapils; Honningmalt; Melanoidin; Munich; Havremalt; Tørverøget malt; Rugmalt; Røget malt; Special B; Victory; Vienna; Hvedemalt; Andet
ko: 특수 맥아 이름/종류: 산성화 맥아; 앰버 맥아; 아로마틱; 비스킷; 갈색 맥아; 카라파(탈각); 크리스털/카라멜; 덱스트린/카라필스; 허니 맥아; 멜라노이딘; 뮌헨; 귀리 맥아; 피트 맥아; 호밀 맥아; 훈제 맥아; 스페셜 B; 빅토리; 비엔나; 밀 맥아; 기타
zh-TW: 特殊麥芽名稱/類型: 酸麥芽; 琥珀麥芽; 芳香麥芽; 餅乾麥芽; 棕色麥芽; Carafa 麥芽 (去殼); 水晶/焦糖麥芽; 糊精/Carapils 麥芽; 蜂蜜麥芽; 類黑素麥芽; 慕尼黑麥芽; 燕麥麥芽; 泥煤麥芽; 黑麥麥芽; 煙燻麥芽; Special B 麥芽; Victory 麥芽; 維也納麥芽; 小麥麥芽; 其他
sv: Namn/typ av specialmalt: Syrad malt; Bärnstensmalt; Aromatisk; Biscuit; Brunmalt; Carafa (skalad); Kristall/karamell; Dextrin/carapils; Honungsmalt; Melanoidin; Münchener; Havremalt; Torvrökt malt; Rågmalt; Rökmalt; Special B; Victory; Wiener; Vetemalt; Annat
pt-PT: Nome/tipo de malte especial: Malte acidulado; Malte âmbar; Aromático; Biscoito; Malte castanho; Carafa (descascado); Cristal/caramelo; Dextrina/carapils; Malte de mel; Melanoidina; Munique; Malte de aveia; Malte turfado; Malte de centeio; Malte fumado; Special B; Victory; Viena; Malte de trigo; Outro
zh-CN: 特种麦芽名称/类型: 酸麦芽; 琥珀麦芽; 芳香型; 饼干风味; 棕色麦芽; Carafa（去壳）; 结晶/焦糖; 糊精/Carapils; 蜂蜜麦芽; 类黑精; 慕尼黑; 燕麦麦芽; 泥煤味麦芽; 黑麦麦芽; 烟熏麦芽; Special B; Victory; 维也纳; 小麦麦芽; 其他
th: ชื่อ/ประเภทของมอลต์พิเศษ: แอซิดูเลเตดมอลต์; แอมเบอร์มอลต์; อะโรมาติก; บิสกิต; บราวน์มอลต์; คาราฟา (ไม่มีเปลือก); คริสตัล/คาราเมล; เดกซ์ทริน/คาราพิลส์; ฮันนี่มอลต์; เมลานอยดิน; มิวนิก; โอ๊ตมอลต์; พีตมอลต์; ไรย์มอลต์; มอลต์รมควัน; สเปเชียลบี; วิกตอรี; เวียนนา; วีทมอลต์; อื่นๆ
ru: Название или тип специального солода: Кислый солод; Янтарный солод; Ароматный; Бисквитный; Коричневый солод; Карафа (без оболочки); Кристальный/Карамельный; Декстриновый/Карапилс; Медовый солод; Меланоидиновый; Мюнхенский; Овсяный солод; Торфяной солод; Ржаной солод; Копченый солод; Спешиал Б (Special B); Виктори (Victory); Венский; Пшеничный солод; Другое
pl: Nazwa/typ słodu specjalnego: Słód zakwaszający; Słód bursztynowy; Aromatyczny; Biskwitowy; Słód brązowy; Carafa (bez łuski); Krystaliczny / karmelowy; Dekstrynowy / Carapils; Słód miodowy; Melanoidynowy; Monachijski; Słód owsiany; Słód torfowy; Słód żytni; Słód wędzony; Special B; Victory; Wiedeński; Słód pszeniczny; Inne
el: Ονομασία/τύπος ειδικής βύνης: Οξινοποιημένη βύνη; Κεχριμπαρένια βύνη; Αρωματική; Μπισκότο; Καφέ βύνη; Carafa (χωρίς φλοιό); Κρυσταλλική/Καραμέλα; Δεξτρίνη/Carapils; Βύνη μελιού; Μελανοϊδίνη; Μονάχου; Βύνη βρώμης; Τυρφώδης βύνη; Βύνη σίκαλης; Καπνιστή βύνη; Special B; Victory; Βιέννης; Βύνη σιταριού; Άλλο
pt-BR: Malte especial nome/tipo: Malte acidificado; Malte âmbar; Aromático; Biscuit; Malte marrom; Carafa (sem casca); Crystal/Caramelo; Dextrina/Carapils; Malte de mel; Melanoidina; Munique; Malte de aveia; Malte turfado; Malte de centeio; Malte defumado; Special B; Victory; Viena; Malte de trigo; Outros
bg-BG: Име/вид специален малц: Подкиселен малц; Кехлибарен малц; Ароматен; Бисквитен; Кафяв малц; Карафа (обелен); Кристален/карамелен; Декстрин/Carapils; Меден малц; Меланоидинов; Мюнхенски; Овесен малц; Опушен с торф малц; Ръжен малц; Опушен малц; Special B; Victory; Виенски; Пшеничен малц; Друго
vi: Tên/loại mạch nha đặc biệt: Mạch nha axit hóa; Mạch nha hổ phách; Aromatic; Biscuit; Mạch nha nâu; Carafa (đã bóc vỏ); Crystal/Caramel; Dextrin/Carapils; Mạch nha mật ong; Melanoidin; Munich; Mạch nha yến mạch; Mạch nha xông khói than bùn; Mạch nha lúa mạch đen; Mạch nha xông khói; Special B; Victory; Vienna; Mạch nha lúa mì; Khác
sk-SK: Názov/druh špeciálneho sladu: Kyslý slad; Jantárový slad; Aromatický; Biskvitový; Hnedý slad; Carafa (lúpaný); Kryštálový/karamelový; Dextrín/Carapils; Medový slad; Melanoidínový; Mníchovský; Ovsený slad; Rašelinový slad; Ražný slad; Údený slad; Special B; Victory; Viedenský; Pšeničný slad; Iný
tr: Özel malt adı/türü: Asitlendirilmiş malt; Kehribar malt; Aromatik; Bisküvi; Kahverengi malt; Carafa (kabuksuz); Kristal/karamel; Dekstrin/Carapils; Ballı malt; Melanoidin; Münih; Yulaf maltı; Turbalı malt; Çavdar maltı; Tütsülenmiş malt; Special B; Victory; Viyana; Buğday maltı; Diğer